test/src/gt-norm-yamls/myv-tests-noun_gt-norm.yaml
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакастонсесэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакастонсесэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакастонсестэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакастонсестэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакастонсеванть
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакастонсеванть
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакастонсевтементь
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакастонсевтементь
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакастонсешканть
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакастонсешканть
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакастонсексэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакастонсексэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакастонсетне
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакастонсетне
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакастонсетнень
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакастонсетнень
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакастонсетненень
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакастонсетненень
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакастонсетнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакастонсетнеде
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакастонсетнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакастонсетнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакастонсетнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакастонсетнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакастонсетнес
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакастонсетнес
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакастонсетнева
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакастонсетнева
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакастонсетнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакастонсетнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакастонсетнев
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакастонсетнев
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакастонсетневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакастонсетневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакастонсетнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакастонсетнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакастонсетненек
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакастонсетненек
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакаванкседе
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакаванкседе
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакаванксекс
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакаванксекс
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакаванксесь
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакаванксесь
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакаванксенть
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакаванксенть
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакаванксентень
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакаванксентень
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакаванкседенть
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакаванкседенть
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакаванксесэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакаванксесэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакаванксестэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакаванксестэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакаванксеванть
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакаванксеванть
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакаванксевтементь
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакаванксевтементь
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакаванксешканть
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакаванксешканть
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакаванксексэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакаванксексэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакаванксетне
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакаванксетне
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакаванксетнень
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакаванксетнень
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакаванксетненень
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакаванксетненень
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакаванксетнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакаванксетнеде
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакаванксетнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакаванксетнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакаванксетнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакаванксетнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакаванксетнес
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакаванксетнес
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакаванксетнева
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакаванксетнева
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакаванксетнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакаванксетнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакаванксетнев
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакаванксетнев
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакаванксетневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакаванксетневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакаванксетнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакаванксетнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакаванксетненек
    псака+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакаванксетненек
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакатседе
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакатседе
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакатсекс
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакатсекс
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакатсесь
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакатсесь
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакатсенть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакатсенть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакатсентень
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакатсентень
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакатседенть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакатседенть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакатсесэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакатсесэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакатсестэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакатсестэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакатсеванть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакатсеванть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакатсевтементь
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакатсевтементь
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакатсевтомонть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакатсевтомонть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакатсексэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакатсексэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакатсетне
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакатсетне
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакатсетнень
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакатсетнень
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакатсетненень
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: псакатсетненень
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакатсетнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: псакатсетнеде
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакатсетнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: псакатсетнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакатсетнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: псакатсетнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакатсетнес
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: псакатсетнес
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакатсетнева
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакатсетнева
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакатсетнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: псакатсетнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакатсетнев
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: псакатсетнев
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакатсетневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: псакатсетневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакатсетнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: псакатсетнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакатсетненек
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: псакатсетненек
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакавтомотседе
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: псакавтомотседе
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакавтомотсекс
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: псакавтомотсекс
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакавтомотсесь
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: псакавтомотсесь
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакавтомотсенть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: псакавтомотсенть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакавтомотсентень
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: псакавтомотсентень
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакавтомотседенть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: псакавтомотседенть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакавтомотсесэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: псакавтомотсесэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакавтомотсестэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: псакавтомотсестэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакавтомотсеванть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: псакавтомотсеванть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакавтомотсевтементь
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: псакавтомотсевтементь
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакавтомотсевтомонть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: псакавтомотсевтомонть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакавтомотсексэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: псакавтомотсексэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакавтомотсетне
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: псакавтомотсетне
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакавтомотсетнень
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: псакавтомотсетнень
